Illinois, session 104th, SB217.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 4-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/4-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 4-101)7    Sec. 4-101. Creation of fund. In each municipality as 8defined in Section 4-103, the the city council or the board of 9trustees, as the case may be, shall establish and administer a 10firefighters' pension fund as prescribed in this Article, for 11the benefit of its firefighters and of their surviving 12spouses, children and certain other dependents. The duty of 13the corporate authorities of a municipality to establish and 14administer a firefighters' pension fund shall be suspended 15during any period during which the fund is dissolved under 16subsection (c) of Section 4-106.1 of this Code.17(Source: P.A. 97-99, eff. 1-1-12.)